Oklahoma, session 2025, SB782.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 1277, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 1277.


UNLAWFUL CARRY IN CERTAIN PLACES


A. It shall be unlawful for any person, including a person in


possession of a valid handgun license issued pursuant to the

Req. No. 1193 Page 1


provisions of the Oklahoma Self-Defense Act, to carry any concealed


or unconcealed firearm into any of the following places:


1. Any structure, building, or office space which is owned or


leased by a city, town, county, the state or federal governmental


authority for the purpose of conducting business with the public;


2. Any courthouse, courtroom, prison, jail, detention facility,


or any facility used to process, hold, or house arrested persons,


prisoners, or persons alleged delinquent or adjudicated delinquent,


except as provided in Section 21 of Title 57 of the Oklahoma


Statutes;


3. Any public or private elementary or public or private


secondary school, except as provided in subsections C and D of this


section;


4. Any publicly owned or operated sports arena or venue during


a professional sporting event, unless allowed by the event holder;


5. Any place where gambling is authorized by law, unless


allowed by the property owner;


6. Any other place specifically prohibited by law; and


7. Any public property set aside by a county, city, town,


public trust with a county, city, or town as a beneficiary, or state


governmental authority for an event that is secured with minimum-


security minimum security provisions; provided, however, the


provisions of this paragraph shall not apply to and shall not


specifically exclude events held on the fairgrounds and in buildings

Req. No. 1193 Page 2


on the fairgrounds that are open to the general public during the


Oklahoma State Fair or the Tulsa State Fair. For purposes of this


paragraph, a minimum-security minimum security provision consists of


a location that is secured utilizing the following:


a. a metallic-style security fence that is at least eight


(8) feet in height that encompasses the property and


is secured in such a way as to deter unauthorized


entry,


b. controlled access points staffed by a uniformed,


commissioned peace officer, and


c. a metal detector whereby persons walk or otherwise


travel with their property through or by the metal


detector.;


8. Any public building used for a public meeting conducted


under the Oklahoma Open Meeting Act, unless otherwise authorized by


law; and


9. Any public facility providing substance abuse or mental


health services or any facilities providing substance abuse programs


to persons who are under the direct supervision of a municipality, a


county, or the state, unless otherwise authorized by law.


B. It shall be lawful for a person to carry a concealed or


unconcealed firearm on the following properties:





Req. No. 1193 Page 3


1. Any property set aside for the use or parking of any


vehicle, whether attended or unattended, by a city, town, county,


state, or federal governmental authority;


2. Any property set aside for the use or parking of any


vehicle, whether attended or unattended, which is open to the


public, or by any entity engaged in gambling authorized by law;


3. Any property adjacent to a structure, building, or office


space in which concealed or unconcealed weapons are prohibited by


the provisions of this section;


4. Any property designated by a city, town, county, or state


governmental authority as a park, recreational area, wildlife


refuge, wildlife management area, or state or county fairgrounds;


provided, nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to authorize


any entry by a person in possession of a concealed or unconcealed


firearm into any structure, building, office space or event which is


specifically prohibited by the provisions of subsection A of this


section;


5. Any property set aside by a public or private elementary or


secondary school for the use or parking of any vehicle, whether


attended or unattended; provided, however, the firearm shall be


stored and hidden from view in a locked motor vehicle when the motor


vehicle is left unattended on school property; and


6. Any public property set aside temporarily by a county, city,


town, public trust with a county, city, or town as a beneficiary, or

Req. No. 1193 Page 4


state governmental authority for the holder of an event permit that


is without minimum-security minimum security provisions, as such


term is defined in paragraph 7 of subsection A of this section;


provided, the carry of firearms within said the permitted event area


shall be limited to concealed carry of a handgun unless otherwise


authorized by the holder of the event permit; and


7. The fairgrounds and buildings of the fairgrounds that are


open to the general public during the Oklahoma State Fair or the


Tulsa State Fair; provided, the handgun is carried in a concealed


manner. The event holder shall be authorized to allow for the open


carry of all lawful firearms during the Oklahoma State Fair or the


Tulsa State Fair.


Nothing contained in any provision of this subsection or


subsection C of this section shall be construed to authorize or


allow any person in control of any place described in subsection A


of this section to establish any policy or rule that has the effect


of prohibiting any person in lawful possession of a handgun license


or otherwise in lawful possession of a firearm from carrying or


possessing the firearm on the property described in this subsection.


C. A concealed or unconcealed weapon may be carried onto


private school property or in any school bus or vehicle used by any


private school for transportation of students or teachers by a


person who is licensed pursuant to the Oklahoma Self-Defense Act,


provided a policy has been adopted by the governing entity of the

Req. No. 1193 Page 5


private school that authorizes the carrying and possession of a


weapon on private school property or in any school bus or vehicle


used by a private school. Except for acts of gross negligence or


willful or wanton misconduct, a governing entity of a private school


that adopts a policy which authorizes the possession of a weapon on


private school property, a school bus, or a vehicle used by the


private school shall not be subject to liability for any injuries


arising from the adoption of the policy. The provisions of this


subsection shall not apply to claims pursuant to the Administrative


Workers’ Compensation Act.


D. Notwithstanding paragraph 3 of subsection A of this section,


a A board of education of a school district may adopt a policy


pursuant to Section 5-149.2 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes to


authorize the carrying of a handgun onto school property by school


personnel specifically designated by the board of education,


provided such personnel either:


1. Possess a valid armed security guard license as provided for


in Section 1750.1 et seq. of Title 59 of the Oklahoma Statutes the


Oklahoma Security Guard and Private Investigator Act; or


2. Hold a valid reserve peace officer certification as provided


for in Section 3311 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes.


Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to restrict authority


granted elsewhere in law to carry firearms.



Req. No. 1193 Page 6


E. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection A of this


section, on any property designated as a municipal zoo or park of


any size that is owned, leased, operated, or managed by:


1. A public trust created pursuant to the provisions of Section


176 of Title 60 of the Oklahoma Statutes; or


2. A nonprofit entity,


an individual shall be allowed to carry a concealed handgun but not


openly carry a handgun on the property. The public trust or


nonprofit entity shall be authorized to allow for the open carry of


all lawful firearms on the property of the public trust or nonprofit


entity.


F. Any person violating the provisions of paragraph 2 or 3 of


subsection A of this section shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a


misdemeanor punishable by a fine not to exceed Two Hundred Fifty


Dollars ($250.00). A person violating any other provision of


subsection A of this section may be denied entrance onto the


property or removed from the property. If the person refuses to


leave the property and a peace officer is summoned, the person may


be issued a citation for an amount not to exceed Two Hundred Fifty


Dollars ($250.00).


G. No person in possession of a valid handgun license issued


pursuant to the provisions of the Oklahoma Self-Defense Act or who


is carrying or in possession of a firearm as otherwise permitted by


law or who is carrying or in possession of a machete, blackjack,

Req. No. 1193 Page 7


loaded cane, hand chain, or metal knuckles shall be authorized to


carry the firearm, machete, blackjack, loaded cane, hand chain, or


metal knuckles into or upon any college, university, or technology


center school property, except as provided in this subsection. For


purposes of this subsection, the following property shall not be


construed to be college, university, or technology center school


property:


1. Any property set aside for the use or parking of any motor


vehicle, whether attended or unattended, provided the firearm,


machete, blackjack, loaded cane, hand chain, or metal knuckles are


carried or stored as required by law and the firearm, machete,


blackjack, loaded cane, hand chain, or metal knuckles are not


removed from the motor vehicle without the prior consent of the


college or university president or technology center school


administrator while the vehicle is on any college, university, or


technology center school property;


2. Any property authorized for possession or use of firearms,


machetes, blackjacks, loaded canes, hand chains, or metal knuckles


by college, university, or technology center school policy; and


3. Any property authorized by the written consent of the


college or university president or technology center school


administrator, provided the written consent is carried with the


firearm, machete, blackjack, loaded cane, hand chain, or metal



Req. No. 1193 Page 8


knuckles and the valid handgun license while on college, university,


or technology center school property.


The college, university, or technology center school may notify


the Oklahoma State Bureau of Investigation within ten (10) days of a


violation of any provision of this subsection by a licensee. Upon


receipt of a written notification of violation, the Bureau shall


give a reasonable notice to the licensee and hold a hearing. At the


hearing, upon a determination that the licensee has violated any


provision of this subsection, the licensee may be subject to an


administrative fine of Two Hundred Fifty Dollars ($250.00) and may


have the handgun license suspended for three (3) months.


Nothing contained in any provision of this subsection shall be


construed to authorize or allow any college, university, or


technology center school to establish any policy or rule that has


the effect of prohibiting any person in lawful possession of a


handgun license or any person in lawful possession of a firearm,


machete, blackjack, loaded cane, hand chain, or metal knuckles from


possession of a firearm, machete, blackjack, loaded cane, hand


chain, or metal knuckles in places described in paragraphs 1, 2, and


of this subsection. Nothing contained in any provision of this


subsection shall be construed to limit the authority of any college,


university, or technology center school in this state from taking


administrative action against any student for any violation of any


provision of this subsection.

Req. No. 1193 Page 9


H. The provisions of this section shall not apply to the


following:


1. Any peace officer or any person authorized by law to carry a


firearm in the course of employment;


2. District judges, associate district judges, and special


district judges, who are in possession of a valid handgun license


issued pursuant to the provisions of the Oklahoma Self-Defense Act


and whose names appear on a list maintained by the Administrative


Director of the Courts, when acting in the course and scope of


employment within the courthouses of this state;


3. Private investigators with a firearms authorization when


acting in the course and scope of employment;


4. Elected officials An elected official of a county, who are


is in possession of a valid handgun license issued pursuant to the


provisions of the Oklahoma Self-Defense Act, may carry a concealed


handgun when acting in the performance of his or her duties within


the courthouses of the county in which he or she was elected. The


provisions of this paragraph shall not allow the elected county


official to carry the handgun into a courtroom;


5. The sheriff of any county may authorize certain employees of


the county, who possess a valid handgun license issued pursuant to


the provisions of the Oklahoma Self-Defense Act, to carry a


concealed handgun when acting in the course and scope of employment


within the courthouse in the county in which the person is employed.

Req. No. 1193 Page 10


Nothing in the Oklahoma Self-Defense Act shall prohibit the sheriff


from requiring additional instruction or training before granting


authorization to carry a concealed handgun within the courthouse.


The provisions of this paragraph and of paragraph 6 of this


subsection shall not allow the county employee to carry the handgun


into a courtroom, sheriff’s office, adult or juvenile jail, or any


other prisoner detention area; and


6. The board of county commissioners of any county may


authorize certain employees of the county, who possess a valid


handgun license issued pursuant to the provisions of the Oklahoma


Self-Defense Act, to carry a concealed handgun when acting in the


course and scope of employment on county annex facilities or grounds


surrounding the county courthouse.


I. For the purposes of this section, “motor vehicle” means any


automobile, truck, minivan, sports utility vehicle, or motorcycle,


as defined in Section 1-135 of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes,


equipped with a locked accessory container within or affixed to the


motorcycle.


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 1290.22, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 1290.22.


BUSINESS OWNER’S RIGHTS


A. Except as provided in subsections B, C, and D of this


section, nothing contained in any provision of the Oklahoma Self-

Req. No. 1193 Page 11


Defense Act shall be construed to limit, restrict, or prohibit in


any manner the existing rights of any person, property owner,


tenant, employer, liquor store, place of worship, or business entity


to control the possession of weapons on any property owned or


controlled by the person or business entity.


B. No person, property owner, tenant, employer, liquor store,


holder of an event permit, place of worship, or business entity


shall be permitted to establish any policy or rule that has the


effect of prohibiting any person, except a convicted felon, from


transporting and storing firearms in a locked vehicle on any


property set aside for any vehicle.


C. A property owner, tenant, employer, liquor store, place of


worship, or business entity may prohibit any person from carrying a


concealed or unconcealed firearm on the property. If the building


or property is open to the public, the property owner, tenant,


employer, liquor store, place of worship, or business entity shall


post signs on or about the property stating such prohibition.


D. No person, property owner, tenant, employer, liquor store,


holder of an event permit, place of worship, or business entity


shall be permitted to establish any policy or rule that has the


effect of prohibiting any person from carrying a concealed or


unconcealed firearm on property within the specific exclusion


provided for in paragraph 4 of subsection B of Section 1277 of this



Req. No. 1193 Page 12


title; provided that carrying a concealed or unconcealed firearm may


be prohibited in the following places:


1. The portion of a public property structure or building


during an event authorized by the city, town, county, or state or


federal governmental authority owning or controlling such building


or structure;


2. Any public property sports field including any adjacent


seating or adjacent area set aside for viewing a sporting event,


where an elementary or secondary school, collegiate, or professional


sporting event or, an International Olympic Committee or


organization or any committee subordinate to the International


Olympic Committee event, or a horse racing event is being held;


3. The fairgrounds during the Oklahoma State Fair or the Tulsa


State Fair; and


4. 3. The portion of a public property structure or building


that is leased or under contract to a business or not-for-profit


entity or group for offices.


E. The otherwise lawful carrying of a concealed or unconcealed


firearm by a person on property that has signs prohibiting the


carrying of firearms shall subject the person to being denied


entrance onto the property or removed from the property. If the


person:





Req. No. 1193 Page 13


1. Has been informed by the property owner, business entity, or


manager of the business that the person is in violation of a policy


that prohibits firearms on the property; and


2. Refuses to leave the property and a peace officer is


summoned, the person shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a


misdemeanor punishable by a fine not to exceed Two Hundred Fifty


Dollars ($250.00).


F. A person, property owner, tenant, employer, liquor store,


holder of an event permit, place of worship, or business entity that


does or does not prohibit any individual, except a convicted felon,


from carrying a loaded or unloaded, concealed or unconcealed weapon


on property that the person, property owner, tenant, employer,


liquor store, holder of an event permit, place of worship, or


business entity owns, or has legal control of, is immune from any


liability arising from that decision. Except for acts of gross


negligence or willful or wanton misconduct, an employer who does or


does not prohibit his or her employees from carrying a concealed or


unconcealed weapon is immune from any liability arising from that


decision. A person, property owner, tenant, employer, liquor store,


holder of an event permit, place of worship, or business entity that


does not prohibit persons from carrying a concealed or unconcealed


weapon pursuant to subsection D of this section shall be immune from


any liability arising from the carrying of a concealed or


unconcealed weapon, while in the scope of employment, on the

Req. No. 1193 Page 14


property or in or about a business entity vehicle. The provisions


of this subsection shall not apply to claims pursuant to the


Administrative Workers’ Compensation Act.


G. It shall not be considered part of an employee’s job


description or within the employee’s scope of employment if an


employee is allowed to carry or discharge a weapon pursuant to this


section.


H. Nothing in subsections F and G of this section shall prevent


an employer, employee, or person who has suffered loss resulting


from the discharge of a weapon to seek redress or damages of the


person who discharged the weapon or used the weapon outside the


provisions of the Oklahoma Self-Defense Act.


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-1193 CN 1/19/2025 5:43:13 AM



















Req. No. 1193 Page 15